Missouri, session 2026, SB951.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 541.033, 562.071, 563.026, and
565.002, RSMo, are repealed and five new sections enacted in
lieu thereof, to be known as sections 1.207, 541.033, 562.071,
563.026, and 565.002, to read as follows:
1.207. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as the "Equal Protection Act".
2. Acknowledging the sanctity of innocent human life,
created in the image of God, it is the intent of the general
assembly:
(1) To acknowledge the sanctity of innocent human
life, created in the image of God, which should be equally
protected from the beginning of biological development to
natural death;
(2) To acknowledge the Constitution of the United
States as overriding anything in the constitution of this
state contrary to it, as it provides, "This Constitution,
and the Laws of the United States which shall be made in
Pursuance thereof...shall be the supreme Law of the Land;
and the Judges in every State shall be bound thereby, any
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 951 2
Thing in the Constitution or Laws of any State to the
Contrary notwithstanding.";
(3) To follow the Constitution of the United States,
which requires that "[n]o state...shall deny to any person
within its jurisdiction the equal protection of the laws";
(4) To fulfill that constitutional requirement by
protecting the lives of preborn persons with the same
criminal and civil laws protecting the lives of born persons
by repealing provisions that permit willful prenatal
homicide or assault;
(5) To protect pregnant mothers from being pressured
to abort by repealing provisions that may otherwise allow a
person to solicit, aid, or direct a mother to abort her
child;
(6) To ensure that all persons potentially subject to
such laws are entitled to due process protections; and
(7) To abolish abortion in this state.
3. Unless specifically provided otherwise, enforcement
is subject to the same presumptions, defenses,
justifications, laws of parties, immunities, and clemencies
as would apply where the victim is a person who had been
born alive.
541.033. 1. Persons accused of committing offenses
against the laws of this state, except as may be otherwise
provided by law, shall be prosecuted:
(1) In the county in which the offense is committed; or
(2) If the offense is committed partly in one county
and partly in another, or if the elements of the crime occur
in more than one county, then in any of the counties where
any element of the offense occurred.

SB 951 3
2. Persons accused of committing the offenses of
identity theft against the laws of this state in sections
570.223, 570.224, and 575.120 shall be prosecuted:
(1) In the county in which the offense is committed;
(2) If the offense is committed partly in one county
and partly in another, or if the elements of the offense
occur in more than one county, then in any of the counties
where any element of the offense occurred;
(3) In the county in which the victim resides; or
(4) In the county in which the property obtained or
attempted to be obtained was located.
3. Persons accused of committing an offense against
the laws of this state under chapter 565 where the victim is
an unborn child shall be prosecuted:
(1) In the county in which the offense is committed;
(2) If the offense is committed partly in one county
and partly in another, or if the elements of the offense
occur in more than one county, then in any of the counties
where any element of the offense occurred;
(3) In the county in which the accused resides;
(4) In the county in which the victim resides; or
(5) In the county in which the accused is apprehended.
562.071. 1. It is an affirmative defense that the
defendant engaged in the conduct charged to constitute an
offense because he or she was coerced to do so, by the use
of, or threatened imminent use of, unlawful physical force
upon him or her or a third person, which force or threatened
force a person of reasonable firmness in his situation would
have been unable to resist.
2. The defense of "duress" as defined in subsection 1
is not available:

SB 951 4
(1) As to the [crime] offense of murder, except where
the victim is an unborn child and the defendant is the
child's mother;
(2) As to any offense when the defendant recklessly
places himself or herself in a situation in which it is
probable that he or she will be subjected to the force or
threatened force described in subsection 1 of this section.
563.026. 1. Unless inconsistent with other provisions
of this chapter defining justifiable use of physical force,
or with some other provision of law, conduct which would
otherwise constitute any offense other than a class A felony
or murder is justifiable and not criminal when it is
necessary as an emergency measure to avoid an imminent
public or private injury which is about to occur by reason
of a situation occasioned or developed through no fault of
the actor, and which is of such gravity that, according to
ordinary standards of intelligence and morality, the
desirability of avoiding the injury outweighs the
desirability of avoiding the injury sought to be prevented
by the statute defining the offense charged.
2. The necessity and justifiability of conduct under
subsection 1 of this section may not rest upon
considerations pertaining only to the morality and
advisability of the statute, either in its general
application or with respect to its application to a
particular class of cases arising thereunder. Whenever
evidence relating to the defense of justification under this
section is offered, the court shall rule as a matter of law
whether the claimed facts and circumstances would, if
established, constitute a justification.

SB 951 5
3. Conduct which would otherwise constitute any
offense is justifiable and not criminal when it is a lawful
medical procedure:
(1) Performed by a licensed physician;
(2) Performed on a pregnant female to avert the death
of the pregnant female;
(3) That results in the accidental or unintentional
death of the unborn child the pregnant female is carrying;
and
(4) Performed when all reasonable alternatives to save
the life of the unborn child:
(a) Are unavailable; or
(b) Were attempted unsuccessfully before the
performance of the medical procedure.
4. The defense of justification under this section is
an affirmative defense.
565.002. As used in this chapter, unless a different
meaning is otherwise plainly required the following terms
mean:
(1) "Adequate cause", cause that would reasonably
produce a degree of passion in a person of ordinary
temperament sufficient to substantially impair an ordinary
person's capacity for self-control;
(2) "Child", a person under seventeen years of age;
(3) "Conduct", includes any act or omission;
(4) "Course of conduct", a pattern of conduct composed
of two or more acts, which may include communication by any
means, over a period of time, however short, evidencing a
continuity of purpose. Constitutionally protected activity
is not included within the meaning of course of conduct.
Such constitutionally protected activity includes picketing
or other organized protests;

SB 951 6
(5) "Deliberation", cool reflection for any length of
time no matter how brief;
(6) "Domestic victim", a household or family member as
the term "family" or "household member" is defined in
section 455.010, including any child who is a member of the
household or family;
(7) "Emotional distress", something markedly greater
than the level of uneasiness, nervousness, unhappiness, or
the like which are commonly experienced in day-to-day living;
(8) "Full or partial nudity", the showing of all or
any part of the human genitals, pubic area, buttock, or any
part of the nipple of the breast of any female person, with
less than a fully opaque covering;
(9) "Legal custody", the right to the care, custody
and control of a child;
(10) "Parent", either a biological parent or a parent
by adoption;
(11) "Person", includes a human being, including an
unborn child at every stage of development from the moment
of fertilization until birth;
(12) "Person having a right of custody", a parent or
legal guardian of the child;
[(12)] (13) "Photographs" or "films", the making of
any photograph, motion picture film, videotape, or any other
recording or transmission of the image of a person;
[(13)] (14) "Place where a person would have a
reasonable expectation of privacy", any place where a
reasonable person would believe that a person could disrobe
in privacy, without being concerned that the person's
undressing was being viewed, photographed or filmed by
another;
[(14)] (15) "Special victim", any of the following:

SB 951 7
(a) A law enforcement officer assaulted in the
performance of his or her official duties or as a direct
result of such official duties;
(b) Emergency personnel, any paid or volunteer
firefighter, emergency room, hospital, or trauma center
personnel, or emergency medical technician, assaulted in the
performance of his or her official duties or as a direct
result of such official duties;
(c) A probation and parole officer assaulted in the
performance of his or her official duties or as a direct
result of such official duties;
(d) An elderly person;
(e) A person with a disability;
(f) A vulnerable person;
(g) Any jailer or corrections officer of the state or
one of its political subdivisions assaulted in the
performance of his or her official duties or as a direct
result of such official duties;
(h) A highway worker in a construction or work zone as
the terms "highway worker", "construction zone", and "work
zone" are defined under section 304.580;
(i) Any utility worker, meaning any employee of a
utility that provides gas, heat, electricity, water, steam,
telecommunications services, or sewer services, whether
privately, municipally, or cooperatively owned, while in the
performance of his or her job duties, including any person
employed under a contract;
(j) Any cable worker, meaning any employee of a cable
operator, as such term is defined in section 67.2677,
including any person employed under contract, while in the
performance of his or her job duties; and

SB 951 8
(k) Any employee of a mass transit system, including
any employee of public bus or light rail companies, while in
the performance of his or her job duties;
[(15)] (16) "Sudden passion", passion directly caused
by and arising out of provocation by the victim or another
acting with the victim which passion arises at the time of
the offense and is not solely the result of former
provocation;
[(16)] (17) "Trier", the judge or jurors to whom
issues of fact, guilt or innocence, or the assessment and
declaration of punishment are submitted for decision;
[(17)] (18) "Views", the looking upon of another
person, with the unaided eye or with any device designed or
intended to improve visual acuity, for the purpose of
arousing or gratifying the sexual desire of any person.
Section B. The provisions of this act apply
prospectively only and not retroactively. It applies only
to offenses committed, or causes of action that arise, on or
after the effective date of this act.
Section C. This act is hereby submitted to the
qualified voters of this state for approval or rejection at
an election which is hereby ordered and which shall be held
and conducted on Tuesday next following the first Monday in
August, 2026, under the applicable laws and constitutional
provisions of this state for the submission of referendum
measures by the general assembly, and this act shall become
effective when approved by a majority of the votes cast
thereon at such election and not otherwise.
✓